Utah statutes.
59-12-1704.   Written project prioritization process for new transportation
capacity projects.
(1)  The council of governments shall develop a written prioritization process
for the prioritization of projects to be funded by revenues a county will
receive from a tax under this part.
(2) (a)  The following shall be included in the written prioritization process
under Subsection (1):
(i)  a definition of the type of projects to which the written prioritization
process applies;
(ii)  specification of a weighted criteria system that is used to rank
proposed projects and how the weighted criteria system will be used to
determine which projects will be prioritized;
(iii)  specification of the data that is necessary to apply the weighted
ranking criteria; and
(iv)  any other provisions the council of governments considers appropriate.
(b)  The weighted criteria system described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii) shall
include the following considerations:
(i)  the cost-effectiveness of a project;
(ii)  the degree to which a project will mitigate regional congestion;
(iii)  the compliance requirements of applicable federal laws or regulations;
(iv)  the economic impact of a project;
(v)  the degree to which a project will require tax revenues to fund
maintenance and operation expenses; and
(vi)  any other provisions the council of governments considers appropriate.
(3)  The council of governments of a county of the first or second class shall
submit the proposed written prioritization process described in this section
to the Executive Appropriations Committee for approval prior to taking final
action on the proposed written prioritization process or any proposed
amendment to the written prioritization process.
